Utah statutes.
10-7-20.5.   Restrictions on municipality procurement of architect-engineer services.

(1)  As used in this section, "architect-engineer services" means those professional services within the scope of the practice of architecture as defined in Section 58-3a-102, or professional engineering as defined in Section 58-22-102.

(2)  When a municipality elects to obtain architect or engineering services by using a competitive procurement process and has provided public notice of its competitive procurement process:

(a)  a higher education entity, or any part of one, may not submit a proposal in response to the municipality's competitive procurement process; and

(b)  the municipality may not award a contract to perform the architect or engineering services solicited in the competitive procurement process to a higher education entity or any part of one.



Enacted by Chapter 21, 2000 General Session

